California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Immediately after its completion the diagram shall be delivered to the superintendent of streets, who shall immediately, after the contractor has fulfilled his contract to the satisfaction of the superintendent of streets or the legislative body, on appeal, proceed to estimate upon the lots or parcels of land within the assessment district, as shown by the diagram, the benefits arising from such work, and to be received by each such lot or parcel of land. He shall thereupon assess upon and against the lands in the assessment district the total amount of the costs and expenses of such work, and in so doing shall assess the total sum upon the several lots or parcels of land in the assessment district, benefited thereby, in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by each of the said several lots or parcels of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

5344.

In other respects the assessment shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 16.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Making and Confirming the Assessment [5360. - 5375.1.]

5360.

After the contractor has fulfilled his contract to the satisfaction of the street superintendent, or the engineer if such power has been delegated to him, the superintendent or engineer, as the case may be, shall forthwith make an assessment to cover the sum due for the work performed and specified in the contract, including all incidental expenses, in conformity with the provisions of this part according to the character of the work done, and in the event an acquisition is included in the proceeding, including the amount then estimated by the street superintendent or engineer as the case may be, as the cost of the acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 436.)
-------------------------------------------

5360.2.

The street superintendent in making an assessment shall deduct from the total costs and expenses of the work any contributions authorized to be paid pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing at Section 5125) of Part 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

5360.3.

In assessing land, credit may be given for dedications and for improvements constructed at private expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 739.)
-------------------------------------------

5361.

The assessment shall briefly refer to the contract, the work contracted for and performed, and shall show the amount to be paid therefor, together with all incidental expenses, the amount of each assessment against each lot or portion of a lot, the number of each lot or portion or portions of a lot so assessed, the additional information required by subdivision (b) of Section 53753 of the Government Code, and shall have attached thereto a diagram exhibiting each street or street crossing, place, property or rights of way on which any work has been done, showing the
 relative location of each lot or portion of lot to the work done, numbered to correspond with the numbers of the assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5362.

The assessment shall be filed with the clerk. The clerk shall give notice of the filing of the assessment and of a time to be therein fixed by the clerk when all persons interested in the work done or in the assessment will be heard by the legislative body. The notice shall be posted and in addition be published. The first publication shall be not less than 15 days before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 975.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.

Such notice shall also be given by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5364.

Such notice shall designate the property within the assessment district belonging to the owner by street number, or some other description sufficient to enable the property owner to identify the property, include a statement of the amount proposed to be assessed against such property, and state the name and telephone number of a local department or agency designated by the legislative body to answer inquiries regarding the making of an appeal pursuant to Section 5366.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

5365.

Reference shall be made in the notices required by this chapter to the resolution of intention and the date of its passage for a description of the work therein mentioned and no other description thereof shall be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

5366.

The owners, the contractor, or his assigns, and all other persons interested in any work done under this division, or in the assessment, feeling aggrieved by any act or determination of the superintendent of streets or engineer in relation thereto, or who claim that the work has not been performed according to the contract in a good and substantial manner or who claim that any portion of the work for any reason was omitted or illegally included in the contract or having or making any objection to the correctness of the assessment or diagram or other act, determination or proceedings of the superintendent of streets or engineer, shall prior to the day fixed for the hearing upon
 the assessment appeal to the legislative body by briefly stating in writing the grounds of appeal. Any objection, appeal or protest not made at the time and in the manner hereinabove provided shall be deemed to be waived voluntarily by any person who might have made such appeal, protest or objection, and such person shall be deemed to have consented to the proposed assessment and any other matter on which objection, protest or appeal could be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

5367.

Upon such appeal, the legislative body may remedy and correct any error or informality in the proceedings, and revise and correct any of the acts or determinations of the street superintendent or engineer relative to said work; may confirm, amend, alter, modify or correct the assessment or diagram in such manner as to it shall seem just, and require the work to be completed according to the directions of the legislative body; and may instruct and direct the street superintendent to correct the warrant, assessment, or diagram in any particular.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5368.

All the decisions and determinations of the legislative body, upon notice and hearing as aforesaid, shall be final and conclusive upon all persons entitled to appeal to the legislative body, as to all errors, informalities, and irregularities which the legislative body might have avoided, or have remedied during the progress of the proceedings or which it can at that time remedy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5369.

No assessment, warrant, or diagram, and no proceedings prior to the assessment, shall be held invalid by any court for any error, informality, or other defect in the same, where the resolution of intention of the legislative body to do the work, has been actually published as provided in this division. When no appeal is taken or when the orders and determinations of the legislative body upon appeal have been complied with, and the legislative body is satisfied with the correctness of the assessment, the legislative body shall forthwith confirm the proceedings and the assessment and the street superintendent shall attach thereto a warrant bearing the date of such
 confirmation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5370.

Whenever the resolution of intention declares that a contribution of labor or of labor and any portion of materials, supplies or equipment for the proposed work will be made by any local, State or National agency or authority, an assessment shall be made to cover the sum due for furnishing the materials, supplies or equipment as specified in the contract including all incidental expenses. In all other particulars the assessment shall be made in conformity with this part relating to district assessments. However, if all of the work described in the resolution of intention is not completed because the agency or authority ceases to furnish the labor provided for in the resolution
 of intention, for a period of 90 days, the street superintendent shall notify the legislative body of such cessation in writing. The legislative body may by resolution declare the contract terminated and order the superintendent of streets to make the assessment to cover the portions of work completed and incidental expenses incurred, in accordance with the benefits to be received by each of the several lots or parcels of land in the district, pursuant to the provisions of this part relating to district assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.

To the assessment shall be attached a warrant, which shall be signed by the superintendent of streets, and countersigned by the mayor or the city clerk. The warrant shall be substantially in the following form:

By virtue hereof, I (name of the superintendent of streets), of the City of ______, County of ______ (or County or City and County of ______), State of California, by virtue of the authority vested in me as said superintendent of streets, do authorize and empower (name of contractor) (his or their) agents or assigns, to demand and receive, the several assessments upon the assessment and diagram hereto attached and this
 shall be (his or their) warrant for the same.Date: (Name of superintendent of streets)Countersigned by (name of mayor or city clerk).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

5372.

The warrant, diagram and assessment shall be recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets and in accordance with Section 5372.1 and may be recorded at any hour of the calendar day. Immediately thereafter the clerk shall record a notice of assessment, as provided for in Section 3114, whereupon, as provided in Section 3115, said assessment shall attach as a lien upon the property assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 691.)
-------------------------------------------

5372.1.

No assessment or bond hereafter levied or issued shall become a lien and no person shall be deemed to have notice thereof until a certified copy of the assessment and the diagram attached thereto shall be recorded in the office of the county surveyor if the improvement district or any part thereof is in unincorporated territory and with the superintendent of streets of the city or cities if the improvement district or any part thereof is in incorporated territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 961.)
-------------------------------------------

5372.5.

Upon the confirmation of the assessment by the legislative body, the clerk shall furnish the superintendent of streets with a list containing each assessment or parcel number, as shown on said recorded assessment, and the name and address of the owner or owners of the real property represented by each such number, as shown on the last equalized assessment roll or as on file in the office of the clerk. Such list shall be delivered to the contractor, or his agent or assigns, at the same time and under the same conditions as the delivery of the warrant, assessment and diagram, pursuant to Section 5374.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

5373.

The lien, whether bonds issued to represent the assessment or otherwise, shall be subordinate to all fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon the same property, but it shall have priority over all fixed special assessment liens which may thereafter be created against the property; and from and after the date of the recording of any warrant, assessment and diagram, all persons shall be deemed to have notice of the contents thereof.

The holder of a subordinate assessment or a bond representing a subordinate assessment shall have the rights of an inferior lienholder as provided in Section 2904 of the Civil
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

5374.

The lien of a reassessment and a refunding assessment shall have the same priority as the original assessment to which it relates. A supplemental assessment is a new assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

5374.1.

The amount of any contribution for the cost and expenses of the work shall be paid by the city to the contractor, or his agent, or assigns, upon delivery of the warrant, assessment and diagram, or prior to said delivery, may be paid in installments, for work completed, during the progress of the work. Notice that there will be progress payments must appear in the invitation for bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 979.)
-------------------------------------------

5375.

After the warrant, assessment and diagram are recorded, the same shall be delivered to the contractor, or his agent or assigns, on demand, but not until after the payment to the superintendent of streets of the incidental expenses not previously paid by the contractor, his agent or his assigns, including the amount by which the amount included in the assessment as the cost of any acquisition exceeds the amount previously demanded of the contractor therefor, but with proper credit to the contractor in the event there was included in the assessment as the cost of any acquisition, an amount less than the amount demanded of the contractor therefor at the time of the execution of the
 contract pursuant to Section 5256; provided, however, that when the superintendent of streets has, by ordinance, been authorized and directed to receive payments pursuant to Section 5396 of this division said warrant shall not be delivered to said contractor or assigns nor shall such contractor or assigns be entitled to receive payment of assessments by virtue of said warrant within 30 days from the recordation of said warrant.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5374 by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

5375.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5375 the legislative body may waive the requirement that the contractor, or his agent, or assigns pay the expenses incidental to the cost of the work, or work and acquisition paid for by contribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 979.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Demanding Payment of the Assessment [5390. - 5397.]

5390.

The warrant, after its delivery to the contractor or his assigns, shall be and constitute full authority to the contractor, his agents or assigns, to collect the assessments.

At least 30 days prior to filing the written statement of all payments received upon the assessment, the contractor, his agents or assigns, shall mail a statement to each owner of real property within the assessment district as shown on the list delivered pursuant to Section 5372.5. The statement shall specify a last date for payment of the assessment, which shall be not less than 30 days from the date of mailing. The statements shall contain a designation of property assessed by the assessment or parcel number shown on the recorded assessment, by street number, or some other description sufficient to enable the property owner to identify the property, a statement of the amount of the assessment, and the place of payment, the effect of failure to pay within such time and that, if bonds are to be issued, a statement of that fact, designating the provisions of law pursuant to which the bonds are to be issued. Upon completion of the mailing of the statements, the contractor or his assigns shall file with the superintendent of streets an affidavit setting forth the date and manner of compliance with the requirements of this section.

On or before the last date for payment specified in the notice, assessments may be paid in whole or in part. No payments shall be received upon the assessment by the contractor, or his agents or assigns, without delivering receipts therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

5391.

After 30 days after the date of mailing by the contractor or his assigns of the statement to the property owners pursuant to Section 5390, the contractor, or his assigns, shall sign and file in the office of the superintendent of streets a written statement of all payments received upon the assessment. Thereupon, the superintendent of streets shall file the statement so made with the record of the warrant and assessment by attaching it in the assessment book immediately following the record of the assessment. If under the proceedings being taken bonds are to be issued to represent unpaid assessments, no further payments of assessments can be accepted by the contractor or his assigns after filing said statement, as to any assessment which is to be represented by a bond. When payments are made to the superintendent of streets pursuant to Section 5396 of this division, it shall not be necessary for the contractor or his assigns to file said written statement of payments received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

5392.

The superintendent of streets shall, at any time, receive the amount due upon any assessment and warrant heretofore or hereafter issued by him and give a good and sufficient discharge therefor, except that after the last date for payment of assessments, as specified in the statement provided by Section 5390, the superintendent of streets shall not receive any amount due upon any unpaid assessments for which the legislative body has provided for the issuance of bonds to represent said unpaid assessments. The legislative body may prescribe by ordinance that the duties imposed by this section on the superintendent of streets shall be performed only by the treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

5393.

When suit has been brought to collect the amount due upon any assessment, the plaintiff shall file with the superintendent of streets a written notice of the pendency of the action showing the particular assessments affected by the action. After the filing of the notice, the superintendent of streets shall not receive any money on account of the assessment, and he shall have no authority to cancel the assessment or give any discharge thereof without the written consent of the owner of the assessment until judgment has been rendered in the action or the same has been dismissed and the street superintendent shall omit from the list of properties provided to be sent to the tax collector, any property upon which the assessment described in the notice is a lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5394.

If any warrant is lost, upon proof of such loss a duplicate can be issued upon which collections may be made with the same effect as on the original.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5395.

After the filing of the written statement of all payments received upon the assessment, all amounts remaining due on any assessment, except those assessments for which bonds have been issued or are to be issued, shall draw interest at the rate of 1 percent per month until paid, the interest to be computed from the 31st day after the recordation of the warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

5396.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, the legislative body may, by ordinance, provide that all payments made upon any assessment and warrant within 30 days from the recordation thereof, shall be made to the superintendent of streets, who shall mail a statement to each owner of real property within the assessment district whose name appears on the last equalized assessment roll, at the address appearing on said roll or on file in the office of the clerk, or to both such addresses, if they are not the same. The statement shall contain a designation of the property assessed by street number, or some other description sufficient to enable the property owner to identify the property, statement of the amount of the assessment, and the time and place of payment, the effect of failure to pay within such time and that, if bonds are to be issued, a statement of that fact, designating the provisions of law pursuant to which such bonds are to be issued.

The legislative body may further provide by said ordinance that the superintendent of streets shall receive partial payments upon any assessment and that notice thereof be given to property owners by the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

5397.

If the superintendent of streets is authorized by ordinance to collect the assessments, the ordinance shall also provide that the superintendent of streets shall furnish to the contractor or his assigns a good and sufficient surety bond conditioned upon the full and prompt payment by the superintendent of streets to the contractor or his assigns of all assessments so collected by him. The bond shall be in an amount not less than 10 percent of the total amount of the assessment shown on the assessment roll if such total amount does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and shall be in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) if the total amount of the assessments shown on the assessment roll exceeds the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The premium on the bond shall be payable as a part of the incidental expenses of the proceeding.

As an alternative the legislative body, in its discretion, may provide in such ordinance that a blanket surety bond shall be maintained on file in the office of the city clerk, conditioned as above, in amounts herein provided. Such blanket bond shall cover and protect all contractors and their assigns holding warrants for assessments which the superintendent of streets is authorized to collect. The premium on such blanket bond may be prorated to the several special assessment proceedings as a part of the incidental expenses of such proceedings.

As a further alternative, the legislative body, in its discretion, may provide in such ordinance that the official bond of the superintendent of streets shall guarantee the full and prompt payment by the superintendent of streets to the contractor or his assigns of all assessments collected by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Collecting the Assessment by Action [5410. - 5423.]

5410.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable to assessments represented by the issuance of bonds nor to assessments collected on the tax rolls but shall be applicable only to other cash assessments levied pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5411.

At any time after the first day of July next succeeding nine months following the date of recording the assessment, the contractor or his assignee may sue in his own name the owner of the land, lots or portions of lots assessed on the day of the date of the recording of the warrant, assessment and diagram, and recover the amount of any assessment remaining unpaid together with interest and any penalties allowed under this chapter. If any State, county or municipal taxes or any other special assessment is delinquent on the property the action may be brought at any time after 90 days after the recording of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.

When an action has been brought for the recovery of any assessments, the plaintiff shall be entitled to have and recover attorney fees on each assessment sued on. If the action is settled or a tender made prior to the trial of the action, or if judgment is taken on default, the attorney’s fees shall be five dollars ($5) plus one dollar ($1) additional for each lot or parcel of land included in one action. If the action proceeds to trial the court having jurisdiction of the cause shall fix and allow a reasonable attorney fee, which shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15) plus one dollar ($1) additional for each lot or parcel of land included in one action. The attorney’s fee in either case shall be in addition to all taxable costs and the plaintiff may have judgment therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5413.

If the court finds an unnecessary number of actions have been brought, where the parties are identical, it may allow the costs of one action only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5414.

An action for the recovery of any assessment may be brought in the superior court within whose jurisdiction the city is, in which the work has been done. If any of the assessments are made against lots, portions of lots, or lands, the service of process in the action may be made in the manner prescribed by law. A single action may be brought under any assessment irrespective of the number of lots assessed where the parties defendant are identical. If separate actions are brought, they may be consolidated by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5415.

The warrant, assessment and diagram, with proof of nonpayment shall be prima facie evidence of the regularity and correctness of the assessment and of the prior proceedings and acts of the superintendent of streets, and the legislative body upon which the warrant, assessment and diagram are based, and prima facie evidence of the right of the plaintiff to recover in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5416.

The plaintiff in such action may recover the cost of any abstract or report of search of title procured in good faith in order to determine ownership. The search shall be made by a reputable abstractor or title company and the cost shall not exceed five dollars ($5) per lot. The abstract or report of search together with the affidavit of payment shall be filed in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5417.

In a complaint in any action for the recovery of an assessment it shall be sufficient to allege briefly that the legislative body ordered the work, the performance of the work under the contract, the making of the assessment, the issuing of the warrant and the making of the diagram; that an assessment (naming the amount) was levied against that certain lot or parcel of land (describing it) which, according to the information and belief of the plaintiff, is owned by the defendant; and that payment of the assessment has not been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5418.

In describing a lot or parcel of land in a complaint for the recovery of any assessment it shall be sufficient to refer to the same by its number upon the diagram; provided, a certified copy of the warrant, assessment and diagram shall have been previously filed in the office of the recorder of the county in which the lot or parcel of land is situated. It shall be the duty of the recorder to so file any such certified copy presented to him upon payment of the filing fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

5419.

Upon the entry of judgment or dismissal of the action the clerk of the court shall forthwith mail to the street superintendent of the city having jurisdiction over the proceeding in which the assessment was levied, a certified copy of the judgment or other evidence sufficient to advise the street superintendent of the judgment of the court in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 586.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5420.

If the contractor or his agent or any person acting in behalf of the contractor shall, prior to the filing of a complaint for the recovery of any assessment, or subsequent to the filing of the action and prior to the allowance of attorney fees and costs, make any written demand upon or present any bill or notice in writing to the owner, demanding, requesting or notifying such owner to pay or that there is due, attorney’s fees or court costs in connection with the collection of the assessment, then the superintendent of streets is authorized, upon written demand of the owner, accompanied by the affidavit of the owner, that such written demand, bill or notice for the payment of attorney’s fees and costs, or either thereof, was made upon or presented to such owner prior to the commencement of the action, or subsequent to the filing of the action and prior to the allowance of attorney’s fees and costs, together with such written demand, bill or notice to mark said assessment “paid” and such assessment shall thereby be deemed to be paid and the lien thereof released. This section shall not apply to the service of summons and complaint in a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5421.

If an action is brought for the recovery of any assessment prior to the time permitted for bringing such action, the plaintiff shall not recover and the defendant shall be entitled to have and recover such attorney’s fees as the court may deem reasonable in addition to all taxable costs and he may have judgment therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5422.

The court in which an action for the recovery of an assessment is commenced shall have power to adjudge and decree a lien against the premises assessed, and to order such premises to be sold on execution, as in other cases of the sale of real estate by the process of the courts. On appeal, the appellate courts shall be vested with the same power to adjudge and decree a lien and to order such premises to be sold on execution or decree as is conferred on the court from which an appeal is taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 171.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

5423.

In all actions now pending or hereafter brought under this division to recover street assessments, the proceedings therein shall be governed and regulated by the provisions of this division, and also, when not in conflict herewith, by the laws of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18.1. Collecting the Assessment on the Tax Roll [5450. - 5458.]

5450.

As an alternative method for the collection of cash assessments or assessments of less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) levied under the provisions of this division, the legislative body, upon the written request of the contractor or his assigns, shall, by resolution adopted on or before the third Tuesday in September, direct that such assessments be collected upon the tax roll upon which general taxes are collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

5451.

Said resolution shall contain a description of the properties so assessed, the amount of such assessments, together with interest thereon from the date of filing the original list of unpaid assessments and at the rate of 1 percent per month to the next succeeding thirty-first day of December of the tax year for which such roll shall have been prepared, and the total amounts of principal and interest on each property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5452.

A certified copy of said resolution shall be delivered immediately to the officer designated by law to extend city taxes upon the tax roll on which they are collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5453.

Said officer shall extend upon such roll the total amounts of such assessments and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5454.

Said amounts shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner, as general municipal taxes are collected, and be subject to the same penalties and interest, and to the same procedure under foreclosure and sale in case of delinquency, as provided for general municipal taxes, all of which laws for the levy, enforcement and collection of which are hereby made applicable to such special assessment taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5455.

Said assessments and the interest so entered shall become due and payable to the contractor or his assigns at the office of the city treasurer on the second day of January next succeeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5456.

Upon default in payment, the lands so assessed shall be sold in the same manner in which real property in such city is sold for the nonpayment of general municipal taxes, and be subject to redemption within one year from the date of sale in the same manner as such real property is redeemed from such delinquent sale, and upon failure of such redemption, shall in like manner be sold or pass by deed to the city. The city shall not, however, be required to pay into the assessment fund any part of such delinquency until such property be redeemed or sold and money received therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5457.

Upon receipt of such deed the city shall thereupon offer and sell such property at public auction in the manner provided by law for the sale of its tax-deeded property, and the amount of said assessment and the penalties and interest thereon shall be paid to said contractor or his assigns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5458.

In the event there shall have been no bidder offering the amount then due on such property, it may, at the city’s election, be declared sold to the owner of such assessment, and in like manner be deeded to him, and such assessment ordered satisfied of record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Reassessments [5500. - 5511.]

5500.

If any assessment heretofore or hereafter made, issued or filed in the office of the clerk is void or unenforceable for any cause or if bonds have been or are issued to represent or be secured by any assessments and such issuance was or is not effective through the curative provisions in relation thereto, or any curative act that may be passed by the Legislature in relation thereto to make them valid and enforceable, then, in any of such events a reassessment therefor may be issued. A reassessment may be made upon the initiative of the legislative body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 856.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.

The true intent and meaning of this chapter is to make the cost and expense of any work made through an attempted compliance with this division payable by the real estate benefited by such work by making a reassessment therefor.

Such power of reassessing embraces both a full and partial reassessment, and is not exhausted by a single attempted exercise thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5502.

A reassessment shall be ordered under any one of the following circumstances:

(a) Whenever the owner or holder of any assessments, or bonds issued under this division to represent or be secured by assessments, or the person who would own or hold any such assessment or bonds if they were issued, requests the legislative body to order a reassessment. In such event if the legislative body is of the opinion that the assessments or bonds in question are not enforceable, it shall order the making and issuing of a reassessment covering only the assessments owned or held by the petitioner, or the assessments represented or secured by the bonds owned or held by such petitioner, or which would be owned or held by petitioner if issued.

(b) Whenever any court of competent jurisdiction in any action to foreclose the lien of any assessment or to enforce the obligation of any bond issued to represent or be secured by any assessments issued under this division for any reason holds such lien unenforceable, then it shall in and by its decree direct the making of a reassessment to cover the assessments involved in such action.

(c) Whenever any court of competent jurisdiction in any action to set aside the lien of any assessment or of any bond representing any assessment or in any action to quiet title against the lien of any such assessment, or bond, or in any action to enjoin the making, filing, confirmation or issuance of any assessment or bond to pay for the cost and expenses of any work done under this division, in its judgment decrees such assessments or bonds to be void or unenforceable, or enjoins the making, filing or issuance or confirmation of any such assessment or bond, then it shall in and by its decree direct the making of a reassessment to cover the assessments involved in such action.

(d) Whenever any contractor or assignee of a contractor has done or performed any work pursuant to proceedings had and taken in attempted compliance with this division, and whenever prior to the issuance of any assessment, any court of competent jurisdiction in any action to invalidate the contract or any of such proceedings for any reason declares the contract or other proceedings to be invalid, then such court shall in and by its decree direct the making of a reassessment for the reasonable value of the work actually done and performed in good faith by the contractor, or such portion thereof as was of a kind that could lawfully have been ordered under the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5503.

The superintendent of streets shall, upon the entering of a decree of court directing a reassessment or upon the making of an order by the legislative body directing a reassessment, proceed to make a reassessment in the following manner:

(a) If the reassessment is a partial one only, then it shall not be necessary for the diagram to show any other lots than the ones covered by such partial reassessment.

(b) If it is a full reassessment, the superintendent of streets shall prepare and file with the reassessment a diagram showing the lots or parcels of land deemed by him to have been benefited by the work. The reassessment shall assess upon and against each of the lots or parcels of land contained therein an amount arrived at as follows:
